Louisiana, session 2026, HB87.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4305(B)(3) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4305. Domicile; meetings; officers; bonds; depositories; compensation; rate fixing
* * *
B.
* * *
(3) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this Subsection or of any other
provision of law, no member of the board of commissioners of Livingston Parish Gas
Utility District No. 1 shall receive a salary for the performance of his duties as a
member. Each member may receive a per diem for each meeting attended, up to
fifty meetings per year, and for each day devoted to the business of the district. The
board shall fix the amount of the per diem in an amount not to exceed seventy-five
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 87 ENROLLED
one hundred twenty-five dollars per day. A member may be reimbursed for all
proper expenses incurred in carrying out the business of the district. The board may
fix reasonable additional compensation, commensurate with the additional duties
performed, for a member who serves as secretary or treasurer or secretary-treasurer
of the board.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.